California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) The department determines that the pilot program is resulting in a lower level of access to, or use of, vision care services for children under the participating health plans.

(2) The department determines that the pilot
 program is resulting in fraud, waste, or abuse of Medi-Cal funds.

(3) The department determines there is a lack of funding for the vision care services provided in the pilot program.

(j) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(k) The department shall obtain any federal approvals necessary to implement this section and to obtain federal matching funds to the maximum extent permitted by federal law.

(l) This
 section shall be implemented only if and to the extent all federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(m) This section shall be implemented only to the extent an annual appropriation is made available to the department each fiscal year for the specific purpose of implementing this section.

(n) If the department determines, pursuant to subdivision (h), that the pilot program is having a positive impact on access and utilization and that additional funds are available, the director may extend the pilot program described in this section to Medi-Cal managed care plans in other counties and applicable local jurisdictions. Any extension shall be implemented only to the extent that any additional and necessary federal approvals are obtained, and if sufficient funds are made available to participating plans for this purpose. The department may accept
 funding from private foundations in order to implement an extension under this subdivision to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(o) The department shall post on its Internet Web site a notice that has terminated or expanded the pilot program, including identification of the geographic locations, and shall notify appropriate fiscal and policy committees of both houses of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 40, Sec. 4.   (SB 870)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Note: See related declaration of intent in Stats. 2014, Ch. 40, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.82. Managed Health Care Expansion into Rural Counties [14087.98. - 14087.98.]

14087.98.

(a) The purpose of this article is to provide a comprehensive program of managed health care plan services to Medi-Cal recipients residing in the following counties that currently receive Medi-Cal services on a fee-for-service basis: Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Lake, Lassen, Mariposa, Modoc, Nevada, Mono, Placer, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, and Yuba.

(b) The director may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis with one or more managed health care plans to provide a comprehensive program of managed health
 care plan services to Medi-Cal recipients residing in the counties described in subdivision (a). The director shall give special consideration to managed health care plans that meet all of the following:

(1) Have demonstrated experience in effectively serving Medi-Cal beneficiaries, including diverse populations.

(2) Have demonstrated experience in effectively partnering with public and traditional safety net health care providers.

(3) Have demonstrated experience in working with local stakeholders, including consumers, providers, advocates, and county officials, in plan oversight and in delivery of care.

(4) Have the lowest administrative costs.

(5) Show support from local county officials as demonstrated by an action of the county board of supervisors.

(6) Show recent successful experience with expansion of managed care to a rural area.

(7) Offer a quality improvement program for primary care providers.

(c) Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The managed health care plans that
 the department contracts with under this article shall comply with the requirements of Section 14087.48 and meet all of the following:

(1) Have Medi-Cal managed health care plan contract experience, or evidence of the ability to meet these contracting requirements.

(2) Be in good financial standing and meet licensure requirements under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), if applicable.

(3) Meet quality measures, which may include Medi-Cal and Medicare Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set measures and other quality measures determined or developed by the department and the federal Centers for
 Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(e) The managed health care plans that the department contracts with under this article shall provide Medi-Cal beneficiaries with information about enrollment rights and options, plan benefits and rules, and care plan elements so that beneficiaries have the ability to make informed choices. This information shall be delivered in a format and language accessible to beneficiaries. The managed health care plans shall provide access to providers in compliance with applicable state and federal laws, including, but not limited to, physical accessibility and the provision of health plan information in alternative formats.

(f) The department shall conduct a stakeholder process including relevant stakeholders to ensure that beneficiaries, health care providers,
 and managed health care plans have an opportunity to provide input into the delivery model for these counties and to help ensure smooth care transitions for beneficiaries.

(g) Enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed health care plan or plans under this article shall be mandatory in order to receive services under Medi-Cal, except as otherwise provided by law.

(h) Each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be informed that the beneficiary or applicant may choose to continue an established patient-provider relationship if the person’s treating provider is a primary care provider or clinic contracting with the managed health care plan, has the available capacity, and agrees to continue to treat that beneficiary or eligible applicant. The managed health care plans shall comply with continuity of
 care requirements in Section 1373.96 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section and amend regulations and orders adopted by the department by means of plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action, until the time regulations are adopted. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department have temporary authority as necessary to implement program changes until completion of the regulatory process.

(2) The department shall adopt emergency regulations no later than July 1, 2014. The department may readopt any emergency regulation
 authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted pursuant to this section. The initial adoption of emergency regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(3) The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(j) The cost of any program established under this section shall not exceed the total amount that the department estimates it would pay for all services and requirements within the same geographic area under the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program.

(k) The department shall have exclusive authority to set the rates, terms, and conditions of managed health care plan contracts and contract amendments under this article. The director may include in the contract a provision for quality assurance withholding from the plan payment, to be paid only if quality measures identified in the plan contract are met.

(l) The department shall provide the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature with quarterly updates, commencing January
 1, 2014, and ending January 1, 2016, regarding the expansion of Medi-Cal managed care into the new counties authorized pursuant to this section. These updates shall include, but not be limited to, continuity of care requests, grievance and appeal rates, and utilization reports for the new counties.

(m) The department shall seek all necessary federal approvals to allow for federal financial participation in expenditures under this article. This article shall not be implemented until all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(n) This section shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation or funding is available.

(o) Notwithstanding Section 7926.220 of the Government Code,
 a contract or contract amendments executed by both parties after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision shall be considered a public record for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be disclosed upon request. This subdivision applies to contracts that reveal the department’s rates of payment for health care services, the rates themselves, and rate manuals.

(p) To implement this section, the department may contract with public or private entities. Contracts or amendments entered into under this section may be on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis and a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from the following:

(1) Part 2 (commencing
 with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by that part.

(2) Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Review or approval of contracts by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 444.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.9. Primary Care Provider Case Management [14088. - 14088.25.]

14088.

(a) The purpose of this article is to ensure that the Medi-Cal program shall be operated in the most cost-effective and efficient manner possible with the optimum number of Medi-Cal providers, and shall ensure quality of care and known access to services.

(b) For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Primary care provider” means either of the following:

(A) (i) Any internist, general practitioner, obstetrician-gynecologist, pediatrician, family physician and surgeon, nonphysician medical practitioner, or
 any primary care clinic, rural health clinic, community clinic or hospital outpatient clinic currently enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, which agrees to provide case management to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “family physician” means a primary care physician and surgeon who renders continued comprehensive and preventative health care services to individuals and families, and who has received specialized training in an approved family medicine residency for three years after graduation from an accredited medical school.

(B) A county or other political subdivision that employs, operates, or contracts with, any of the primary care providers listed in
 subparagraph (A), and that agrees to use that primary care provider for the purposes of contracting under this article.

(2) “Primary care case management” means responsibility for the provision of referral, consultation, ordering of therapy, admission to hospitals, followup care, and prepayment approval of referred services.

(3) “Designation form” or “form” means a form supplied by the department to be executed by a Medi-Cal beneficiary and a primary care provider or other entity eligible pursuant to this article who has entered into a contract with the department pursuant to this article, setting forth the beneficiary’s choice of contractor and an agreement to be limited by the case management decisions of that contractor and the contractor’s agreement to be responsible for
 that beneficiary’s case management and medical care, as specified in this article.

(4) “Emergency services” means health care services rendered by an eligible Medi-Cal provider to a Medi-Cal beneficiary for those health services required for alleviation of severe pain or immediate diagnosis and treatment of unforeseen medical conditions which if not immediately diagnosed and treated could lead to disability or death.

(5) “Modified primary care case management” means primary care case management wherein capitated services are limited to primary care practitioner office visits only.

(6) “Service area” means an area designated by either a single federal Postal ZIP Code or by two or more Postal ZIP Codes that are
 contiguous.

(c) For purposes of Medi-Cal managed care plans, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 14016.5, “nonphysician medical practitioner” means a physician assistant performing services under physician and surgeon supervision in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, a certified nurse-midwife performing services under physician and surgeon supervision in compliance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a nurse practitioner performing services in collaboration with a physician and surgeon pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 632, Sec. 16.   (AB 1622)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.05.

For purposes of this article, “primary care case management plan” means a primary care provider or other entity who has contracted with the department pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.2.

The primary care provider or other entity eligible pursuant to this article with whom a contract has been entered into pursuant to this article shall have responsibility for providing for case management as defined, pursuant to Section 14088.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1212, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.4.

(a) No reimbursement shall be provided, for any beneficiary receiving case management services, for any services covered by the contract entered into pursuant to this article, except emergency services and dental services, not authorized pursuant to case management decisions made by the appropriate contractor.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a provider shall be reimbursed for covered services rendered to a beneficiary, when the department’s automated eligibility
 verification system, developed pursuant to Section 14042, fails to indicate that the beneficiary is subject to receiving case management services, provided that claims for these services meet all other requirements for valid claims under the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1212, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.5.

The beneficiary shall be permitted to disenroll from any contract entered into pursuant to this article upon request, except where prohibited under the provisions of any federal waivers obtained by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1212, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.6.

In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this article is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this article may be on a nonbid basis and shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 834, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.7.

Primary care providers and other entities with whom a contract has been entered into pursuant to this article shall be exempt from Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for purposes of carrying out the contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1212, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.8.

(a) The department may establish modified primary care case management contracts pursuant to this article. This authority shall be subject to the department seeking and obtaining all necessary federal waivers to implement this section.

(b) In establishing modified primary care case management contracts pursuant to this article, the department may enter into contracts with providers whose application to develop a full primary care case management contract has been accepted by
 the department and who are working with the department to document, develop, and install the required systems, policies, and procedures. These contracts may provide for the following:

(1) The modified primary care case management contract would have effect only until the contractor’s full primary care case management contract is executed.

(2) The scope of services covered and the case management and utilization control responsibilities of the contractor may be more limited than under a full primary care case management.

(3) Formal enrollment of Medi-Cal beneficiaries with the contractor would occur but the contractor could be reimbursed on a fee-for-service basis for the services the contractor provides to them. Beneficiaries enrolling under the modified primary care case management contract would remain enrolled
 under the full primary care case management contract entered into by the contractor.

(4) Contractor quality of care requirements could be modified to reflect the contractor’s fee-for-service managed care mode of health care delivery.

(5) Evaluation by the department of the contractor’s efficiency, case management effectiveness and the calculation of any savings and savings sharing would reflect the temporary fee-for-service approach under which the contractor is operating.

(c) Contracts shall not be entered into by the department unless the waivers or revision to any existing waiver are granted by the federal government. The provisions for which appropriate federal waivers cannot be obtained shall not be implemented, but provisions for which waivers are either obtained or found to be unnecessary shall be unaffected
 by the inability to obtain federal waivers for other provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 81.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.85.

(a) The department may enter into primary care case management contracts with primary care providers that serve persons infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). Except as otherwise provided in this section, contracts made pursuant to this section shall be subject to all the requirements of this article and regulations of the department.

(b) Primary care providers contracted with pursuant to this section may provide services exclusively to Medi-Cal eligible persons
 infected with HIV.

(c) Capitation payment rates for primary care providers under this section shall be calculated based on the equivalent fee-for-service costs of providing care to HIV infected patients rather than on the equivalent fee-for-service cost of providing care to all Medi-Cal patients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 34, Sec. 1.   Effective April 20, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.12.

Primary care case management contractors shall establish, maintain, and conduct an active, ongoing outreach and recruitment effort to add primary care and specialty providers to their networks to the extent necessary to meet the health care needs of their enrollees. Contractors shall submit to the department documentation regarding the participation and availability of primary care and specialty providers added to their network on or after enactment of this section. The department may enter into primary care case management contracts with children’s
 hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 78.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.13.

The department shall approve those Medi-Cal services for which the contractor is at risk that shall be provided in any contract or contracts for services under the primary care provider case management program. Medi-Cal services provided under any contract or contracts for services under this article shall be subject to review and approval by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1348, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.14.

The department may enter into contracts pursuant to this article with nurse practitioners, acting within the scope of practice of a nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwives, acting within the scope of practice of a certified nurse midwife, and, for the purpose of providing services to populations with special medical problems, with any physician who has specialized in an area of medicine relevant to the special population to be served and who is currently enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 55.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.15.

A plan shall not use false advertising or false statements to induce enrollment. No solicitation of enrollees shall include the granting or offering of any monetary or other valuable consideration for enrollment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1056, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.16.

The department or a county which has contracted for the provision of services pursuant to this article may, within service areas designated by the department, enter into contracts with primary care providers. The contracts shall be on a capitated rate or risk-sharing basis, or a combination of both. The rate of payment for services shall not vary solely according to the category of licensure of the facility in which the services are rendered by providers within each service area. The rate of payment established under the contract shall not exceed the total per capita amount which the department estimates would be payable for all services and requirements
 covered under the contract if all such services and requirements were to be furnished Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program.

Prior to entering into any contract for primary care case management under this chapter, the department shall provide public notice of its intent to enter into such a contract. Furthermore, the department shall develop specific criteria for evaluating potential contractors which ensure that all types of primary care providers are given equal consideration in the contractor selection process.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14088.1 by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1348, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.17.

(a) The department may contract under this article, on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, with an established professional organization with a membership which consists of physicians who engage in the types of practices or who provide services in the locations set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 14088.

(b) (1) A contract under this section shall be implemented in a manner consistent with any federal waivers which are obtained by the department to enable such an arrangement.

(2) Where federal waivers permit restrictions on beneficiary freedom of choice, the contract shall provide covered Medi-Cal beneficiaries with an initial choice of a primary care physician and a procedure through which a beneficiary may change primary care physicians with good cause.

(c) This section shall apply only to the provision of services to beneficiaries who, for purposes of Medi-Cal eligibility determination, are residents of Lake County, Mendocino County, or Sonoma County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.18.

(a) In order to increase the number of nonprofit providers under this article, the department may enter into contracts each fiscal year under this section with eligible nonprofit organizations to provide a one-time interest-bearing loan, repayable at the Pooled Money Investment Account rate, to that eligible organization.

(b) Contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall be limited to contracts within those counties where the department does not have contracts
 authorized by this article on the effective date of this section.

(c) Any loan entered into pursuant to this section shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(d) The department shall adopt standards and procedures for loan applications and repayment of the loans made pursuant to this section.

(e) The department shall make no loan pursuant to this section until the department has made savings payments to contractors who have entered into contracts under this article on or before the effective date of this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, “eligible nonprofit organization” means any organization which meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The organization is
 exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(25)(C)(iii) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(2) The organization is organized to provide health care to the medically underserved and to provide services in service areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 834, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.19.

(a) The department may enter into primary care case management contracts pursuant to this article with any health care service plan that is licensed by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

The terms of the contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall be exempt from those provisions of Chapter 2.2 (commencing with
 Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code that regulate health care service plan contracts. Nothing in this section shall preclude the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care from otherwise regulating a health care service plan subject to the Knox-Keene Health Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) When a health care service plan enters into a contract pursuant to this article and also pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), there shall be no duplication of service areas between the two contracts without prior written approval by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.22.

Sections 14408, 14409, 14410, and 14411 shall apply to primary care case management plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 859, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.23.

(a) The department may apply one or more of the following sanctions against any contractor for failure to comply with the requirements of this article, regulations adopted by the department, the contract between the contractor and the department, or for other good cause shown. Good cause includes, but is not necessarily limited to, three repeated and uncorrected findings of serious deficiencies that have the potential to endanger patient care, as defined by the department in accordance with this section, identified in the medical audits
 conducted by the department:

(1) Terminate the contract.

(2) Suspend enrollment and marketing activities.

(3) Require the contractor to suspend or terminate personnel of the contractor or to terminate participation by subcontractors specified by the department.

(4) Impose civil penalties not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation pursuant to regulations adopted by the director. Unless imposed in error, penalties shall not be returned to the plan.

(5) Take other appropriate action as determined necessary by the department.

(b) The department shall give the contractor and any other persons who may be directly
 interested not less than 30 days’ notice of its intention to impose any of the sanctions authorized by this section.

(c) The notice required by subdivision (b) shall be written, and shall specify each requirement that has not been met, the proposed effective date of the sanction or sanctions, and the amount and duration of each proposed sanction.

(d) (1) Within five working days after the receipt of the written notice required by subdivision (b), the contractor may submit notice of its intent to comply with the requirements specified in the written notice.

(2) If the contractor submits the notice of intent authorized by paragraph (1), the department shall allow the contractor to demonstrate its compliance with the requirements specified in the department’s written notice. Substantial compliance
 shall be achieved within 30 calendar days from the date of the submission of the notice of intent to comply by the contractor. Within 15 days following the completion of the 30-day compliance correction period, the department shall review the corrective actions taken by the contractor and, if appropriate, approve those actions.

(3) If a contractor subject to notice to apply sanctions under subdivision (b) does not demonstrate appropriate corrective compliance within the 30-day corrective action period or does not submit a notice of intent to comply with the requirements specified in the notice required by subdivision (b), the department shall notify the contractor, in writing, of the effective date and terms of the sanction or sanctions applied pursuant to this section.

(4) The department may make one or more of the following temporary suspension orders as an immediate sanction:
 temporarily suspend enrollment activities, temporarily suspend marketing activities, require the contractor temporarily to suspend specified personnel of the contractor, or require the contractor temporarily to suspend participation by a specified subcontractor. The temporary suspension orders may be effective beginning on the first day after the expiration of the 30-day compliance correction period, if the contractor submitted a notice of intent to comply, but has not demonstrated appropriate corrective action, or beginning on the first day after the notice required by subdivision (b) if the contractor did not submit a notice of intent to comply. All other sanctions shall be effective no earlier than 20 days after the notice specified in paragraph (3).

(5) If the department issues a temporary suspension order as an immediate sanction, it shall notify the contractor of the nature and effective date of the temporary suspension and at the same
 time shall serve the provider with an accusation. Upon receipt of a notice of defense filed by the contractor, the department shall, within 15 days, set the matter for hearing, which shall be held as soon as possible, but not later than 30 days after receipt of the notice of hearing by the contractor. The hearing may be continued at the request of the contractor if a continuance is necessary to permit presentation of an adequate defense. The temporary suspension order shall remain in effect until the hearing is completed and the department has made a final determination on the merits. However, the temporary suspension order shall be deemed vacated if the director fails to make a final determination on the merits within 60 days after the original hearing has been completed.

(6) A contractor may request a hearing in connection with any sanctions applied pursuant to this section, other than those contained in a temporary suspension order, within
 15 working days after the notice of the effective date of the sanctions has been given pursuant to paragraph (3), by sending a letter so stating to the address specified in the notice. The department shall stay implementation of the sanction upon receipt of the request for a hearing. Implementation of the sanction shall remain stayed until the effective date of the final decision of the department.

(7) Except as otherwise provided herein, all hearings to review the imposition of sanctions, including temporary suspension orders, shall be held pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) The department may collect civil penalties imposed pursuant to this section by withholding the amount of the penalty from capitation payments owed by the department to the contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 220, Sec. 35.   Effective August 4, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14088.25.

(a) The department may conduct onsite reviews of a provider or facility that has agreed with the primary care case management contractor or a potential contractor to provide services to beneficiaries enrolled with the contractor. These reviews may be for purposes such as evaluating the capabilities of potential contractors, monitoring quality of care, investigating complaints, and ensuring contractor compliance with the terms of the contract entered into pursuant to this article.

(b) Prior to adding a provider or facility to an existing network of providers and facilities, the primary care case management contractor shall submit a complete prequalification package to the department. The department shall provide to the contractor written acknowledgment that the package is complete within 10 working days.

(c) (1) If the provider or facility proposed for addition to the contractor’s existing network is currently enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, the provider or facility may begin treating beneficiaries enrolled with the contractor immediately upon the contractor’s receipt of the acknowledgment required by subdivision (b), subject to paragraph (2) and subdivision (d).

(2) Whenever warranted, the department may rescind the privilege provided for in paragraph (1) by advance notification to the contractor, pending the onsite
 review required by subdivision (d). Notification shall be in writing and describe the conditions that support the rescission of the privilege.

(d) (1) The department shall conduct an onsite review of the provider or facility within a reasonable period of time after receipt of the package, which shall be not more than 60 days after receipt of the package, unless there are extenuating circumstances.

(2) The department shall notify the contractor in writing of the department’s final decision on the request to add the provider or facility to the contractor’s existing network within 10 working days of the date of the review.

(e) In the conduct of the onsite review of the provider or facility, the department shall not condition approval of the site on adherence by the provider or facility to
 requirements that are not contained in any statute, regulation, or commonly accepted community standard of medical practice that directly applies to the category of provider or facility being inspected. This subdivision does not, however, relieve the contractor of any obligations under the contract entered into pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 56.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.91. Geographic Managed Care Pilot Project [14089. - 14089.8.]

14089.

(a) The purpose of this article is to provide a comprehensive program of managed health care plan services to Medi-Cal recipients residing in clearly defined geographical areas. It is, further, the purpose of this article to create maximum accessibility to health care services by permitting Medi-Cal recipients the option of choosing from among two or more managed health care plans or fee-for-service managed case arrangements, including, but not limited to, health maintenance organizations, prepaid health plans, and primary care case management plans. Independent practice associations, health insurance carriers, private foundations, and university medical centers systems, not-for-profit clinics, and other primary care providers, may be offered as
 choices to Medi-Cal recipients under this article if they are organized and operated as managed care plans, for the provision of preventive managed health care plan services.

(b) The department may seek proposals and then shall enter into contracts based on relative costs, extent of coverage offered, quality of health services to be provided, financial stability of the health care plan or carrier, recipient access to services, cost-containment strategies, peer and community participation in quality control, emphasis on preventive and managed health care services and the ability of the health plan to meet all requirements for both of the following:

(1) Certification, where legally required, by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care and the Insurance Commissioner.

(2) Compliance with all of the following:

(A) The health plan shall satisfy all applicable state and federal legal requirements for participation as a Medi-Cal managed care contractor.

(B) The health plan shall meet any standards established by the department for the implementation of this article.

(C) The health plan receives the approval of the department to participate in the pilot project under this article.

(c) (1) (A) The proposals shall be for the provision of preventive and managed health care services to specified eligible populations on a capitated,
 prepaid, or postpayment basis.

(B) Enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed health care plan under this article shall be voluntary for beneficiaries eligible for the federal Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled Program (Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(2) The cost of each program established under this section shall not exceed the total amount that the department estimates it would pay for all services and requirements within the same geographic area under the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program.
